Tennessee statutes. Title 69 Waters, Waterways, Drains And Levees
Part 1

Water Quality Control Act

69-3-101. Short title.

This part shall be known as the “Water Quality Control Act of 1977.”

Acts 1971, ch. 164, § 1; 1977, ch. 366, § 1; T.C.A., § 70-324.

Compiler's Notes. For transfer of the bureau of environment in the department of health and its related functions and the administration of the Tennessee environmental statutes (excluding title 68, chs. 14, 110 and 112) from the department of health to the department of conservation and environment, see Executive Order No. 42 (February 4, 1991).

Cross-References. Major energy projects, coordination of regulation, title 13, ch. 18.

Nontraditional sewage disposal systems, regulation by water and wastewater treatment authorities, §68-221-607.

Taxation of pollution control equipment, §67-5-604.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 25 Tenn. Juris., Waters and Watercourses, § 12.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Water Quality Control Act of 1971, 25 Vand. L. Rev. 325, 331.

Attorney General Opinions. Permit requirements for landowners, OAG 97-039, 1997 Tenn. AG LEXIS 38 (4/7/97).

Proposed private act purporting to give a single county zoning and regulatory authority over business activities and property uses that are subject to regulation by the department of environment and would be inconsistent with general laws and would constitute invalid class legislation, OAG 04-105, 2004 Tenn. AG LEXIS 123 (7/02/04).

69-3-102. Declaration of policy and purpose.

Recognizing that the waters of Tennessee are the property of the state and are held in public trust for the use of the people of the state, it is declared to be the public policy of Tennessee that the people of Tennessee, as beneficiaries of this trust, have a right to unpolluted waters. In the exercise of its public trust over the waters of the state, the government of Tennessee has an obligation to take all prudent steps to secure, protect, and preserve this right.

It is further declared that the purpose of this part is to abate existing pollution of the waters of Tennessee, to reclaim polluted waters, to prevent the future pollution of the waters, and to plan for the future use of the waters so that the water resources of Tennessee might be used and enjoyed to the fullest extent consistent with the maintenance of unpolluted waters.

Moreover, an additional purpose of this part is to enable the state to qualify for full participation in the national pollutant discharge elimination system (NPDES) established under § 402 of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act, Public Law 92-500 (33 U.S.C. § 1342).

Additionally, it is intended that all procedures in this part shall be in conformity with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 1971, ch. 164, § 2; 1977, ch. 366, § 1; T.C.A., § 70-325; Acts 1992, ch. 684, § 1.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee Water Law, You Never Miss the Water Till the Well Runs Dry (Vincent A. Sikora), 24 No. 5 Tenn. B.J. 12 (1988).

69-3-103. Part definitions. [See contingent amendment to subdivisions (4) and (19) and the Compiler’s Notes.]

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Administrator” means the administrator, or head by whatever name, of the United States environmental protection agency;

“Animal feeding operation” means a lot or facility, other than an aquatic animal production facility, where the following conditions are met:

Animals, other than aquatic animals, have been, are, or will be stabled or confined and fed or maintained for a total of forty-five (45) days or more in any twelve-month period; and

Crops, vegetation, forage growth, or post-harvest residues are not sustained in the normal growing season over any portion of the lot or facility;

“Areawide waste treatment management plan” means a plan that has been approved by the administrator pursuant to § 208 of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act, Public Law 92-500 (33 U.S.C. § 1288);

[Current version. See second version for contingent amendment and Compiler’s Notes.]

“Board” means the board of water quality, oil and gas, created in § 69-3-104;

[Contingent amendment. See the Compiler’s Notes.]

“Boat” means any vessel or watercraft moved by oars, paddles, sails or other power mechanism, inboard or outboard, or any vessel or structure floating upon the water whether or not capable of self-locomotion, including, but not limited to, houseboats, barges, docks, and similar floating objects;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of environment and conservation or the commissioner's duly authorized representative and, in the event of the commissioner's absence or a vacancy in the office of commissioner, the deputy commissioner;

“Construction” means any placement, assembly, or installation of facilities or equipment, including contractual obligations to purchase such facilities or equipment, at the premises where such equipment will be used, including preparation work at such premises;

“Department” means the department of environment and conservation;

“Director” means the director of the division of water management of the department;

“Discharge of a pollutant,” “discharge of pollutants,” and “discharge,” when used without qualification, each refer to the addition of pollutants to waters from a source;

“Division” means the division of water management;

“Effluent limitation” means any restriction, established by the board or the commissioner, on quantities, rates and concentrations of chemical, physical, biological, and other constituents that are discharged into waters or adjacent to waters;

“Forestry best management practices” means those land and water resource conservation measures that prevent, limit, or eliminate water pollution for forest resource management purposes, as provided in rules promulgated in this part in accordance with § 11-4-301(d)(18). Until those rules are effective, “forestry best management practices” will be those that have been developed by the division of forestry of the department of agriculture. The commissioner of agriculture shall specifically identify these interim forestry best management practices prior to September 1, 2000;

“Industrial user” means those industries identified in the standard industrial classification manual, bureau of the budget, 1967, as amended and supplemented, under the category “Division D — Manufacturing” and such other classes of significant waste producers as the board or commissioner deems appropriate;

“Industrial wastes” means any liquid, solid, or gaseous substance, or combination thereof, or form of energy including heat, resulting from any process of industry, manufacture, trade, or business or from the development of any natural resource;

“Liquid waste management system” means a waste management system that collects, stores, or land applies manure in a liquid, flowable form;

“Local administrative officer” means the chief administrative officer of a pretreatment agency that has adopted and implemented an approved pretreatment program pursuant to this part and 33 U.S.C. § 1251 et seq. and 40 CFR 403.1 et seq.;

“Local hearing authority” means the administrative board created pursuant to an approved pretreatment program that is responsible for the administration and enforcement of that program and §§ 69-3-123 — 69-3-129;

[Current version. See second version for contingent amendment and see Compiler’s Notes.]

“Member” means a member of the board of water quality, oil and gas;

[Contingent amendment. See the Compiler’s Notes.]

“Municipal separate storm sewer system” means a municipal separate storm sewer system as defined in the Clean Water Act (33 U.S.C. § 1251 et seq.), and the rules promulgated thereunder;

“New source” means any source, the construction of which is commenced after the publication of state or federal regulations prescribing a standard of performance applicable to such source;

“Obligate lotic aquatic organisms” means organisms that require flowing water for all or almost all of the aquatic phase of their life cycles;

“Operator” as used in the context of silvicultural activities, means any person who conducts or exercises control over any silvicultural activities; provided, however, that the term “operator” does not include an owner if the silvicultural activities are being conducted by an independent contractor;

“Other wastes” means any and all other substances or forms of energy, with the exception of sewage and industrial wastes, including, but not limited to, decayed wood, sand, garbage, silt, municipal refuse, sawdust, shavings, bark, lime, ashes, offal, oil, hazardous materials, tar, sludge, or other petroleum byproducts, radioactive material, chemicals, heated substances, dredged spoil, solid waste, incinerator residue, sewage sludge, munitions, biological materials, wrecked and discarded equipment, rock, and cellar dirt;

“Owner” as used in the context of silvicultural activities, means any person or persons that own or lease land on which silvicultural activities occur or own timber on land on which silvicultural activities occur;

“Owner or operator” means any person who owns, leases, operates, controls, or supervises a source;

“Person” means any and all persons, including individuals, firms, partnerships, associations, public or private institutions, state and federal agencies, municipalities or political subdivisions, or officers thereof, departments, agencies, or instrumentalities, or public or private corporations or officers thereof, organized or existing under the laws of this or any other state or country;

“Pollutant” means sewage, industrial wastes, or other wastes;

“Pollution” means such alteration of the physical, chemical, biological, bacteriological, or radiological properties of the waters of this state, including, but not limited to, changes in temperature, taste, color, turbidity, or odor of the waters that will:

Result or will likely result in harm, potential harm or detriment to the public health, safety, or welfare;

Result or will likely result in harm, potential harm or detriment to the health of animals, birds, fish, or aquatic life;

Render or will likely render the waters substantially less useful for domestic, municipal, industrial, agricultural, recreational, or other reasonable uses; or

Leave or likely leave the waters in such condition as to violate any standards of water quality established by the board;

“Pretreatment agency” means the owner of a publicly owned treatment works permitted pursuant to this part that is required by its permit to adopt and enforce an approved pretreatment program that complies with this part and 33 U.S.C. § 1251 et seq. and 40 CFR 403.1 et seq.;

“Pretreatment program” means the rules, regulations, and/or ordinances of a pretreatment agency regulating the discharge and treatment of industrial waste that complies with this part and 33 U.S.C. § 1251 et seq. and 40 CFR 403.1 et seq.;

“Qualified local program” means a municipal separate storm sewer system that has been approved as such by the department pursuant to this part;

“Regional administrator” means the regional administrator of the United States environmental protection agency whose region includes Tennessee, or any person succeeding to the duties of this official;

“Schedules of compliance” means a schedule of remedial measures including an enforceable sequence of actions or operations leading to compliance with an effluent limitation, condition of a permit, other limitation, prohibition, standard, or regulation;

“Sewage” means water-carried waste or discharges from human beings or animals, from residences, public or private buildings, or industrial establishments, or boats, together with such other wastes and ground, surface, storm, or other water as may be present;

“Sewerage system” means the conduits, sewers, and all devices and appurtenances by means of which sewage and other waste is collected, pumped, treated, or disposed;

“Silvicultural activities” means those forest management activities associated with the harvesting of timber and including, without limitation, the construction of roads and trails;

“Source” means any activity, operation, construction, building, structure, facility, or installation from which there is or may be the discharge of pollutants;

“Standard of performance” means a standard for the control of the discharge of pollutants that reflects the greatest degree of effluent reduction that the commissioner determines to be achievable through application of the best available demonstrated control technology, processes, operating methods, or other alternatives, including, where practicable, a standard permitting no discharge of pollutants;

“Stop work order” means an order issued by the commissioner of environment and conservation requiring the operator to immediately cease part or all silvicultural activities;

“Stream” means a surface water that is not a wet weather conveyance;

“Toxic effluent limitation” means an effluent limitation on those pollutants or combinations of pollutants, including disease-causing agents, which after discharge and upon exposure, ingestion, inhalation or assimilation into any organism, either directly from the environment or indirectly by ingestion through food chains, will, on the basis of available information, cause death, disease, behavioral abnormalities, cancer, genetic mutations, physiological malfunctions, including malfunctions in reproduction, or physical deformations, in such organisms or their offspring;

“Variance” means an authorization issued to a person by the commissioner that would allow that person to cause a water quality standard to be exceeded for a limited time period without changing the standard;

“Watercourse” means a man-made or natural hydrologic feature with a defined linear channel that discretely conveys flowing water, as opposed to sheet-flow;

“Waters” means any and all water, public or private, on or beneath the surface of the ground, that are contained within, flow through, or border upon Tennessee or any portion thereof, except those bodies of water confined to and retained within the limits of private property in single ownership that do not combine or effect a junction with natural surface or underground waters; and

“Wet weather conveyance” means, notwithstanding any other law or rule to the contrary, man-made or natural watercourses, including natural watercourses that have been modified by channelization:

That flow only in direct response to precipitation runoff in their immediate locality;

Whose channels are at all times above the groundwater table;

That are not suitable for drinking water supplies; and

In which hydrological and biological analyses indicate that, under normal weather conditions, due to naturally occurring ephemeral or low flow there is not sufficient water to support fish, or multiple populations of obligate lotic aquatic organisms whose life cycle includes an aquatic phase of at least two (2) months.

“Board” means the Tennessee board of energy and natural resources, created by §69-3-104;

“Member” means a member of the Tennessee board of energy and natural resources;

Acts 1971, ch. 164, § 3; 1977, ch. 366, § 1; T.C.A., § 70-326; Acts 1984, ch. 804, § 1; 1987, ch. 111, § 1; 1988, ch. 688, §§ 2, 6; 1992, ch. 693, § 1; 1998, ch. 735, § 1; 2000, ch. 680, § 1; 2009, ch. 464, § 1; 2012, ch. 1019, § 1; 2017, ch. 293, § 1; 2018, ch. 523, §§ 1, 3; 2018, ch. 839, §§ 25, 26.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2012, ch. 986, §§ 26-28 amended §69-3-104 to substitute “board of water quality, oil and gas” for “board of water quality control”.

Acts 2018, ch. 523, § 3, which amended Acts 2017, ch. 293, §§ 3-5, changed the effective date in ch. 293 from March 1, 2018 to July 1, 2018. This amendment results in the amendment to this section by Acts 2018, ch. 523 taking effect on July 1, 2018.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 44 provided that the governor shall take all action necessary to prepare and submit for approval all necessary requests for federal grant funding and applications for authorization to the appropriate federal authority to obtain exclusive jurisdiction over surface coal mining and reclamation operations and the maximum federal money available for those purposes in an expeditious manner.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 45 provided that the commissioner of environment and conservation shall notify the secretary of state and the executive secretary of the Tennessee code commission of the date this state has been approved to exercise primacy over the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations within its territorial boundaries.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall take effect, including for purposes of rulemaking, upon the deposit of federal funds in the Coal Mining Protection Fund.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment by ch. 839, substituted “Tennessee board of energy and natural resources, created by” for “board of water quality, oil and gas, created in” in the definition of “board”; and substituted “Tennessee board of energy and natural resources” for “board of water quality, oil and gas” in the definition “member”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47. [Contingent. See Compiler’s Notes.]

69-3-104. Board of water quality, oil, and gas. [See contingent amendment to subdivisions (a)(1), (4) and (13) and see the Compiler’s Notes.]

[Current version. See second version for contingent amendment and see Compiler’s Notes.]

There is hereby created and established the Tennessee board water quality, oil, and gas, referred to as the “board” in this part, which shall be composed of twelve (12) members as follows:

The commissioner of environment and conservation, who shall be the chair of the board;

The commissioner of health;

The commissioner of agriculture; and

Nine (9) citizen members appointed by the governor for terms of four (4) years.

[Contingent amendment. See the Compiler’s Notes.]

There is hereby created and established the Tennessee board of energy and natural resources, referred to in this part as the “board,” which shall be composed of fourteen (14) members as follows:

The commissioner of environment and conservation, who shall be the chair of the board;

The commissioner of health;

The commissioner of agriculture; and

Eleven (11) citizen members appointed by the governor for terms of four (4) years;

Each ex officio member may, by official order filed with the director, designate a representative from such member's staff who shall have the powers and be subject to the duties and responsibilities of the ex officio member designating the representative, except that the representative designated by the commissioner of environment and conservation shall not serve as chair.

The board shall annually elect a vice chair from among its members, who shall preside over all meetings at which the chair is not present.

[Current version. See second version for contingent amendment and Compiler’s Notes.]

The citizen members of the board shall be appointed as follows:

One (1) of the nine (9) citizen members shall be from the public-at-large. The public member's occupation shall not be in the same primary area of interest as any other citizen member of the board;

One (1) member shall represent environmental interests and may be appointed from lists of qualified persons submitted by interested conservation groups including, but not limited to, the Tennessee conservation league;

One (1) member shall represent counties and may be appointed from lists of qualified persons submitted by interested county services groups including, but not limited to, the County Services Association;

One (1) member shall represent agricultural interests and may be appointed from lists of qualified persons submitted by interested farm business groups including, but not limited to, the Tennessee Farm Bureau;

One (1) member shall represent the municipalities of the state and may be appointed from lists of qualified persons submitted by interested municipal groups including, but not limited to, the Tennessee Municipal League;

One (1) member shall represent small generators of water pollution and may be appointed from lists of qualified persons submitted by interested automotive groups including, but not limited to, the Tennessee Automotive Association;

One (1) member shall represent manufacturing industries and have current full-time employment with a manufacturing concern in Tennessee, shall hold a college degree in engineering or the equivalent, and shall have at least eight (8) years of combined technical training and experience in national pollutant discharge elimination system (NPDES) permit compliance and management of wastewater or water treatment facilities, and may be appointed from lists of qualified persons submitted by interested business groups including, but not limited to, the Tennessee Chamber of Commerce and Industry;

One (1) member shall represent the oil and gas industry; and

One (1) member shall represent oil or gas property owners.

The governor shall consult with the interested groups described in subdivision (a)(4)(A) to determine qualified persons to fill the citizen member positions on the board.

(A) The citizen members of the board shall be appointed as follows:

[Contingent amendment. See the Compiler’s Notes.]

One (1) of the eleven (11) citizen members shall be from the public-at-large. The public member's occupation shall not be in the same primary area of interest as any other citizen member of the board;

One (1) member shall represent environmental interests and may be appointed from lists of qualified persons submitted by interested conservation groups including, but not limited to, the Tennessee conservation league;

One (1) member shall represent counties and may be appointed from lists of qualified persons submitted by interested county services groups including, but not limited to, the County Services Association;

One (1) member shall represent agricultural interests and may be appointed from lists of qualified persons submitted by interested farm business groups including, but not limited to, the Tennessee Farm Bureau;

One (1) member shall represent the municipalities of the state and may be appointed from lists of qualified persons submitted by interested municipal groups including, but not limited to, the Tennessee Municipal League;

One (1) member shall represent small generators of water pollution and may be appointed from lists of qualified persons submitted by interested automotive groups including, but not limited to, the Tennessee Automotive Association;

One (1) member shall represent manufacturing industries and have current full-time employment with a manufacturing concern in Tennessee, shall hold a college degree in engineering or the equivalent, and shall have at least eight (8) years of combined technical training and experience in national pollutant discharge elimination system (NPDES) permit compliance and management of wastewater or water treatment facilities, and may be appointed from lists of qualified persons submitted by interested business groups including, but not limited to, the Tennessee Chamber of Commerce and Industry;

One (1) member shall represent the oil and gas industry;

One (1) member shall represent oil or gas property owners;

One (1) member shall represent the coal mining industry and shall be appointed from lists of qualified persons submitted by interested mining industry groups including, but not limited to, the Tennessee Mining Association; and

One (1) member shall represent owners of coal reserves and shall be appointed from lists of qualified persons submitted by interested mining industry groups including, but not limited to, the Tennessee Mining Association.

The governor shall consult with the interested groups described in subdivision (a)(4)(A) to determine qualified persons to fill the citizen member positions on the board.

Each appointive member shall be a resident and domiciliary of this state.

No member shall be appointed, unless at the time of the member's appointment, the member or the member's employer is in compliance with this part as certified by the commissioner.

The three (3) ex officio members shall hold their positions on the board throughout their respective terms and until the appointment of their successors as such.

All appointments of citizen members shall be for a full four-year term.

Any appointive member who is absent from three (3) consecutive, regularly scheduled meetings shall be removed from the board by the governor.

Upon the death, resignation, or removal of any appointive member, the governor shall appoint some person representing the same area of interest as the member whose position has been vacated to fill the unexpired term of such member.

Appointive members shall continue to serve until a successor has been appointed.

In making appointments to the board, the governor shall strive to ensure that at least one (1) person appointed to serve on the board is sixty (60) years of age or older and that at least one (1) person appointed to serve on the board is a member of a racial minority.

[Current version. See second version for contingent amendment and Compiler’s Notes.]

Notwithstanding subdivision (a)(8), the terms of the appointive members of the board serving on July 1, 2014, shall terminate as follows:

The terms of the members appointed under subdivisions (a)(4)(A)(i) and (ii) shall terminate on September 30, 2016;

The terms of the members appointed under subdivisions (a)(4)(A)(iii) and (iv) shall terminate on September 30, 2017;

The terms of the members appointed under subdivisions (a)(4)(A)(v) and (vi) shall terminate on September 30, 2018; and

The terms of the members appointed under subdivisions (a)(4)(A)(vii), (viii) and (ix) shall terminate on September 30, 2019.

The terms of all members appointed for terms beginning after September 30, 2016, shall be for four (4) years.

(A) Notwithstanding subdivision (a)(8), the terms of the appointive members of the board serving on July 1, 2014, shall terminate as follows:

[Contingent amendment. See the Compiler’s Notes.]

The terms of the members appointed under subdivisions (a)(4)(A)(i) and (ii) shall terminate on September 30, 2016;

The terms of the members appointed under subdivisions (a)(4)(A)(iii) and (iv) shall terminate on September 30, 2017;

The terms of the members appointed under subdivisions (a)(4)(A)(v) and (vi) shall terminate on September 30, 2018;

The terms of the members appointed under subdivisions (a)(4)(A)(vii), (viii) and (ix) shall terminate on September 30, 2019; and

Notwithstanding the term limitations prescribed in subdivision (a)(13)(B):

The term of the member appointed under subdivision (a)(4)(A)(x) shall terminate on September 30 in the year five (5) years after the effective date of this act [See Compiler's Notes.] ; and

The term of the member appointed under subdivision (a)(4)(A)(xi) shall terminate on September 30 in the year six (6) years after the effective date of this act [See Compiler's Notes.] .

The terms of all members appointed for terms beginning after September 30, 2016, shall be for four (4) years.

The state shall ensure that those members of the board who do not receive, or during the previous two (2) years have not received, a significant portion of their income directly or indirectly from permit holders or applicants for a permit shall hear all appeals on permit matters. If the chair is not eligible to hear any permit matter, the members of the board shall select a member by majority vote to serve as chair. An ex officio member of the board who is not eligible to hear a permit matter shall designate a representative to serve on the board for that purpose in accordance with subsection (a). Board member participation in permit matters shall also be in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, part 3, in addition to the provisions set forth in subdivisions (b)(2)-(6) and subsection (h).

For the purposes of this section, “significant portion of their income” means ten percent (10%) of gross personal income for a calendar year, except that it means fifty percent (50%) of gross personal income for a calendar year if the recipient is over sixty (60) years of age and is receiving such portion pursuant to retirement, pension, or similar arrangement.

For the purposes of this section, “permit holders or applicants for a permit” does not include any department or agency of the state.

For the purposes of this section, “income” includes retirement benefits, consultant fees, and stock dividends.

For the purposes of this section, income is not received “directly or indirectly from permit holders or applicants for a permit” where it is derived from mutual fund payments, or from other diversified investments over which the recipient does not know the identity of the primary sources of income. If members other than the ex officio members are not qualified, then the seven (7) citizen members who are not ex officio members shall select, by agreement, qualified temporary replacements to serve for the duration of any proceeding before the board.

For the purposes of this subsection (b), “permit” means national pollutant discharge elimination system (NPDES) permit.

Each member of the board, other than the ex officio member, shall be entitled to be paid fifty dollars ($50.00) for each day actually and necessarily employed in the discharge of official duties, and each member shall be entitled to receive the amount of such member's traveling and other necessary expenses actually incurred while engaged in the performance of any official duties when so authorized by the board, but such expenses shall be made in accordance with the comprehensive state travel regulations promulgated by the commissioner of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

The board shall have two (2) regularly scheduled meetings each year, one (1) in October and one (1) in April. Special meetings may be called by the chair at any time and shall be called as soon as possible by the chair on the written request of two (2) members. Regular meetings of the panel shall be held as necessary to review permit matters. All members shall be duly notified by the technical secretary of the time and place of any regular or special meeting at least five (5) days in advance of such meeting. The majority of the board constitutes a quorum and the concurrence of a majority of those present and voting in any matter within its duties shall be required for a determination of matters within its jurisdiction.

The board shall keep complete and accurate records of the proceedings of all their meetings, a copy of which shall be kept on file in the office of the director and open to public inspection.

The director shall serve as the technical secretary of the board. In that capacity, the member shall report the proceedings of the board pursuant to § 69-3-110 and perform such other duties as the board may require.

If the board incurs a vacancy, it shall notify the appointing authority in writing within ninety (90) days after the vacancy occurs. All vacancies on the board, other than ex officio members, shall be filled by the appointing authority within ninety (90) days of receiving written notice of the vacancy and of providing sufficient information for the appointing authority to make an informed decision in regard to filling such vacancy. If such sufficient information has been provided and the board has more than one (1) vacancy that is more than one hundred eighty (180) days in duration, such board shall report to the house of representatives and senate government operations committees why such vacancies have not been filled.

If more than one half (½) of the positions on the board are vacant for more than one hundred eighty (180) consecutive days, the board shall terminate, provided that such board shall wind up its affairs pursuant to § 4-29-112. If the board is terminated pursuant to this subdivision (g)(2), it shall be reviewed by the evaluation committees pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act before ceasing all its activities. Nothing in this section shall prohibit the general assembly from continuing, restructuring, or reestablishing the board.

No member of the board shall participate in making any decision upon a permit or upon a case in which the municipality, firm or organization which the member represents, or by which the member is employed, or in which the member has a direct substantial financial interest, is involved.

Acts 1971, ch. 164, § 4; 1971, ch. 386, § 1; 1972, ch. 631, § 1; 1976, ch. 806, § 1(125); 1977, ch. 366, § 1; 1979, ch. 422, § 18; T.C.A., § 70-327; Acts 1984, ch. 804, § 2; 1988, ch. 1013, § 72; 1991, ch. 117, § 4; 1992, ch. 693, § 3; 1994, ch. 610, §§ 6, 7, 8; 1994, ch. 628, §§ 3-6; 1995, ch. 155, § 1; 1996, ch. 728, §§ 4-8; 2000, ch. 835, § 6; 2005, ch. 85, §§ 1-4; 2012, ch. 986, §§ 26-28; 2014, ch. 624, §§ 3, 6-8; 2018, ch. 839, §§ 27-29.

Code Commission Notes.

Former subsection (h), concerning the transfer of the functions of the board of reclamation review to the water control board, was deleted as obsolete by the code commission in 2004.

Compiler's Notes. The Tennessee board of water quality, oil, and gas, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2023. See §§4-29-112,4-29-244.

For transfer of the division of surface mining and reclamation and its functions under title 59, ch. 8, parts 2 and 3 and title 59, ch. 10 from the department of conservation (now environment and conservation) to the department of health and environment (now health), see Executive Order No. 40 (February 11, 1983).

Acts 2000, ch. 835, § 7 provided that the act shall not change any procedure, manner, or time that members of the Tennessee motor vehicle commission, who are selected from a list of qualified persons submitted by motor vehicle manufacturers licensed in Tennessee or their consumer replacements, are appointed pursuant to §55-17-103.

Acts 2012, ch. 986, § 48 provided that all rules, regulations, orders, and decisions heretofore issued or promulgated by any of the boards or commissions, which the act terminates or merges into another board or commission, shall remain in full force and effect. In the case of the boards or commissions that are merged with another board or commission by the act, all final rules, regulations, orders, and decisions together with any matters that are pending on October 1, 2012, shall hereafter be administered, enforced, modified, or rescinded in accordance with the law applicable to the continuing board or commission.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 44 provided that the governor shall take all action necessary to prepare and submit for approval all necessary requests for federal grant funding and applications for authorization to the appropriate federal authority to obtain exclusive jurisdiction over surface coal mining and reclamation operations and the maximum federal money available for those purposes in an expeditious manner.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 45 provided that the commissioner of environment and conservation shall notify the secretary of state and the executive secretary of the Tennessee code commission of the date this state has been approved to exercise primacy over the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations within its territorial boundaries.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall take effect, including for purposes of rulemaking, upon the deposit of federal funds in the Coal Mining Protection Fund.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment in (a), substituted “Tennessee board of energy and natural resources” for “Tennessee board of water quality, oil, and gas” and substituted “fourteen (14) members” for “twelve (12) members” in the introductory language in (1); and substituted “Eleven (11) citizen members” for “Nine (9) citizen members” in (1)(D); in (4), substituted “eleven (11)” for “nine (9)” in (A)(i); deleted “and” at the end of (A)(viii); substituted “;” for the period at the end of (A)(ix); and added (A)(x) and (A)(xi); in (13), deleted “and” at the end of (A)(iii); substituted “; and” for the period at the end of (A)(iv); and added (A)(v).

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47. [Contingent. See Compiler’s Notes.]

Cross-References. Interstate mining compact, §§59-10-101 —59-10-103.

Major energy projects, coordination of regulation, title 13, ch. 18.

Severance tax on coal, title 67, ch. 7, part 1.

Law Reviews.

Disqualification of Administrative Officers (William Bates), 13 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 501 (1984).